California, session 20252026, SB726.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5090.77 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:5090.77. (a) The department shall gather information from applicants following each award year for purposes of evaluating the effectiveness of outdoor environmental education programs in achieving the objectives of the grant program. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall annually summarize and report this information for the previous award year to the appropriate budget and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The information in the annual report shall include the total number of children served, the total number and types of entities that received grant awards, appropriate recommendations to improve the grant program, partnerships formed, educational objectives achieved, educational objectives achieved, partnerships formed, the total number of applications received, and the total number of children who would have been served had all applicants for the award year received grant awards.(b) A report required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.